Utah statutes.
20A-4-505.   Communicating about the count.

(1)  It is unlawful for any poll worker to communicate in any manner, directly or indirectly, by word or sign, the progress of the count, the result so far, or any other information about the count.

(2)  Any person who violates this section is guilty of a third degree felony.

